cli/src/main/resources/wordguess_hunspell_pl.aff
SFX I Y 426
SFX I   ąc        ęknę      ląc
SFX I   ąc        ękniesz   ląc
SFX I   ąc        ęknie     ląc
SFX I   ąc        ękniemy   ląc
SFX I   ąc        ękniecie  ląc
SFX I   ąc        ękną      ląc
SFX I   ąc        ęgnę      siąc
SFX I   ąc        ęgniesz   siąc
SFX I   ąc        ęgnie     siąc
SFX I   ąc        ęgniemy   siąc
SFX I   ąc        ęgniecie  siąc
SFX I   ąc        ęgną      siąc
SFX I   ąc        ęgę       rząc
SFX I   ąc        ężesz     rząc
SFX I   ąc        ęże       rząc
SFX I   ąc        ężemy     rząc
SFX I   ąc        ężecie    rząc
SFX I   ąc        ęgą       rząc
SFX I   c         gnę       biec
SFX I   c         gniesz    biec
SFX I   c         gnie      biec
SFX I   c         gniemy    biec
SFX I   c         gniecie   biec
SFX I   c         gną       biec
SFX I   c         knę       ciec
SFX I   c         kniesz    ciec
SFX I   c         knie      ciec
SFX I   c         kniemy    ciec
SFX I   c         kniecie   ciec
SFX I   c         kną       ciec
SFX I   c         kę        [ps]iec
SFX I   0         zesz      [ps]iec
SFX I   0         ze        [ps]iec
SFX I   0         zemy      [ps]iec
SFX I   0         zecie     [ps]iec
SFX I   c         ką        [ps]iec
SFX I   c         kę        lec
SFX I   0         zesz      lec
SFX I   0         ze        lec
SFX I   0         zemy      lec
SFX I   0         zecie     lec
SFX I   c         ką        lec
SFX I   c         gę        trz[ey]c
SFX I   c         żesz      trz[ey]c
SFX I   c         że        trz[ey]c
SFX I   c         żemy      trz[ey]c
SFX I   c         żecie     trz[ey]c
SFX I   c         gą        trz[ey]c
SFX I   c         knę       [^t]rzec
SFX I   c         kniesz    [^t]rzec
SFX I   c         knie      [^t]rzec
SFX I   c         kniemy    [^t]rzec
SFX I   c         kniecie   [^t]rzec
SFX I   c         kną       [^t]rzec
SFX I   óc        ogę       móc
SFX I   óc        ożesz     móc
SFX I   óc        oże       móc
SFX I   óc        ożemy     móc
SFX I   óc        ożecie    móc
SFX I   óc        ogą       móc
SFX I   ć         m         [bcdfghijlkmnstwzż]ać
SFX I   ć         sz        [bcdfghijlkmnstwzż]ać
SFX I   ć         0         [bcdfghijlkmnstwzż]ać
SFX I   ć         my        [bcdfghijlkmnstwzż]ać
SFX I   ć         cie       [bcdfghijlkmnstwzż]ać
SFX I   ć         ją        [bcdfghijlkmnstwzż]ać
SFX I   tać       czę       łtać
SFX I   tać       czesz     łtać
SFX I   tać       cze       łtać
SFX I   tać       czemy     łtać
SFX I   tać       czecie    łtać
SFX I   tać       czą       łtać
SFX I   tać       cę        łtać
SFX I   tać       cesz      łtać
SFX I   tać       ce        łtać
SFX I   tać       cemy      łtać
SFX I   tać       cecie     łtać
SFX I   tać       cą        łtać
SFX I   tać       zczę      [lłw][aiou]stać
SFX I   tać       zczesz    [lłw][aiou]stać
SFX I   tać       zcze      [lłw][aiou]stać
SFX I   tać       zczemy    [lłw][aiou]stać
SFX I   tać       zczecie   [lłw][aiou]stać
SFX I   tać       zczą      [lłw][aiou]stać
SFX I   gać       żę        strugać
SFX I   gać       żesz      strugać
SFX I   gać       że        strugać
SFX I   gać       żemy      strugać
SFX I   gać       żecie     strugać
SFX I   gać       żą        strugać
SFX I   ć         m         [^s]łać
SFX I   ć         sz        [^s]łać
SFX I   ć         0         [^s]łać
SFX I   ć         my        [^s]łać
SFX I   ć         cie       [^s]łać
SFX I   ć         ją        [^s]łać
SFX I   słać      ślę       słać
SFX I   słać      ślesz     słać
SFX I   słać      śle       słać
SFX I   słać      ślemy     słać
SFX I   słać      ślecie    słać
SFX I   słać      ślą       słać
SFX I   ać        ię        [^ąć]pać
SFX I   ać        iesz      [^ąć]pać
SFX I   ać        ie        [^ąć]pać
SFX I   ać        iemy      [^ąć]pać
SFX I   ać        iecie     [^ąć]pać
SFX I   ać        ią        [^ąć]pać
SFX I   ć         m         [ąć]pać
SFX I   ć         sz        [ąć]pać
SFX I   ć         0         [ąć]pać
SFX I   ć         my        [ąć]pać
SFX I   ć         cie       [ąć]pać
SFX I   ć         ją        [ąć]pać
SFX I   ć         m         [^bp]rać
SFX I   ć         sz        [^bp]rać
SFX I   ć         0         [^bp]rać
SFX I   ć         my        [^bp]rać
SFX I   ć         cie       [^bp]rać
SFX I   ć         ją        [^bp]rać
SFX I   ać        zę        [bp]rać
SFX I   ać        zesz      [bp]rać
SFX I   ać        ze        [bp]rać
SFX I   ać        zemy      [bp]rać
SFX I   ać        zecie     [bp]rać
SFX I   ać        zą        [bp]rać
SFX I   tać       czę       kołatać
SFX I   tać       czesz     kołatać
SFX I   tać       cze       kołatać
SFX I   tać       czemy     kołatać
SFX I   tać       czecie    kołatać
SFX I   tać       czą       kołatać
SFX I   tać       cę        kołatać
SFX I   tać       cesz      kołatać
SFX I   tać       ce        kołatać
SFX I   tać       cemy      kołatać
SFX I   tać       cecie     kołatać
SFX I   tać       cą        kołatać
SFX I   tać       czę       [bł]echtać
SFX I   tać       czesz     [bł]echtać
SFX I   tać       cze       [bł]echtać
SFX I   tać       czemy     [bł]echtać
SFX I   tać       czecie    [bł]echtać
SFX I   tać       czą       [bł]echtać
SFX I   tać       cę        [bł]echtać
SFX I   tać       cesz      [bł]echtać
SFX I   tać       ce        [bł]echtać
SFX I   tać       cemy      [bł]echtać
SFX I   tać       cecie     [bł]echtać
SFX I   tać       cą        [bł]echtać
SFX I   tać       czę       oktać
SFX I   tać       czesz     oktać
SFX I   tać       cze       oktać
SFX I   tać       czemy     oktać
SFX I   tać       czecie    oktać
SFX I   tać       czą       oktać
SFX I   tać       cę        woktać
SFX I   tać       cesz      woktać
SFX I   tać       ce        woktać
SFX I   tać       cemy      woktać
SFX I   tać       cecie     woktać
SFX I   tać       cą        woktać
SFX I   tać       czę       lektać
SFX I   tać       czesz     lektać
SFX I   tać       cze       lektać
SFX I   tać       czemy     lektać
SFX I   tać       czecie    lektać
SFX I   tać       czą       lektać
SFX I   tać       cę        lektać
SFX I   tać       cesz      lektać
SFX I   tać       ce        lektać
SFX I   tać       cemy      lektać
SFX I   tać       cecie     lektać
SFX I   tać       cą        lektać
SFX I   ciąć      tnę       ciąć
SFX I   ciąć      tniesz    ciąć
SFX I   ciąć      tnie      ciąć
SFX I   ciąć      tniemy    ciąć
SFX I   ciąć      tniecie   ciąć
SFX I   ciąć      tną       ciąć
SFX I   iąć       nę        [aeooy]giąć
SFX I   iąć       niesz     [aeooy]giąć
SFX I   iąć       nie       [aeooy]giąć
SFX I   iąć       niemy     [aeooy]giąć
SFX I   iąć       niecie    [aeooy]giąć
SFX I   iąć       ną        [aeooy]giąć
SFX I   giąć      egnę      [^aeooy]giąć
SFX I   giąć      egniesz   [^aeooy]giąć
SFX I   giąć      egnie     [^aeooy]giąć
SFX I   giąć      egniemy   [^aeooy]giąć
SFX I   giąć      egniecie  [^aeooy]giąć
SFX I   giąć      egną      [^aeooy]giąć
SFX I   ąć        mę        [aeouy]jąć
SFX I   ąć        miesz     [aeouy]jąć
SFX I   ąć        mie       [aeouy]jąć
SFX I   ąć        miemy     [aeouy]jąć
SFX I   ąć        miecie    [aeouy]jąć
SFX I   ąć        mą        [aeouy]jąć
SFX I   jąć       ejmę      [^aeouy]jąć
SFX I   jąć       ejmiesz   [^aeouy]jąć
SFX I   jąć       ejmie     [^aeouy]jąć
SFX I   jąć       ejmiemy   [^aeouy]jąć
SFX I   jąć       ejmiecie  [^aeouy]jąć
SFX I   jąć       ejmą      [^aeouy]jąć
SFX I   miąć      emnę      zmiąć
SFX I   miąć      emniesz   zmiąć
SFX I   miąć      emnie     zmiąć
SFX I   miąć      emniemy   zmiąć
SFX I   miąć      emniecie  zmiąć
SFX I   miąć      emną      zmiąć
SFX I   iąć       nę        [^z]miąć
SFX I   iąć       niesz     [^z]miąć
SFX I   iąć       nie       [^z]miąć
SFX I   iąć       niemy     [^z]miąć
SFX I   iąć       niecie    [^z]miąć
SFX I   iąć       ną        [^z]miąć
SFX I   ąć        ę         nąć
SFX I   ąć        iesz      nąć
SFX I   ąć        ie        nąć
SFX I   ąć        iemy      nąć
SFX I   ąć        iecie     nąć
