cli/src/main/resources/wordguess_hunspell_pl.dic
bąkać/EHIdikv
bliknąć/BEFIej
broczyć/HIdikv
burknąć/BEFIej
chałturzyć/HIdikv
chłostać/BEHIdikv
chwierutać/EHIdikv
ciepać/BEHIdikv
cudacznieć/BHIejv
człapać/BHIejv
delikatnieć/BHIejv
dochować/EHIdik
dodrzewić/EHIdik
dograć/EHIdik
dokradać/EHIdikv
dołapać/BEHIej
domyślać/EHIdikv
dopiec/BEHIej
dorzucić/EHIdik
doszczepić/EHIdik
dowalać/EHIdikv
drzyzdać/BGHIJdikv
fajtnąć/BEFIej
glamać/BEGHIJdikv
gubić/EHIdikv
jednać/EHIdikv
kisić/EHIdikv
kostnieć/BHIejv
kuksnąć/FIdi
lochać/HIdikv
manić/EHIdikv
migać/EHIdikv
nabiadać/HIdik
naciapać/BEHIej
nadjeżdżać/HIdikv
nadszczerbić/EHIdik
nagnieść/EFIdik
nakreślić/EHIdik
namłócić/EHIdik
napełnić/BEHIdik
naprzeklinać/EHIdik
nasadzać/EHIdikv
nastoperczyć/EHIdik
naśpiewać/EHIdik
nawalać/EHIdikv
nawstrząsać/EHIdik
naznaczać/EHIdikv
obarczać/EHIdikv
obginać/EHIdikv
obłazić/EHIdikv
obrównywać/BEGHIJdikv
obstrzyknąć/BEFIej
obwędzać/EHIdikv
ociemnić/BEHIdi
odcharknąć/BEFIej
odemglać/EHIdikv
odkarmić/EHIdik
odlubić/EHIdik
odolejać/EHIdikv
odpopielać/EHIdikv
odrwić/BEHIdi
odstrzelić/EHIdik
odtrącać/EHIdikv
odwrażliwiać/EHIdikv
ogłuszać/EHIdikv
okrążać/EHIdikv
ominąć/BEFIej
opiewać/EHIdikv
opylić/EHIdik
osłupieć/BHIdi
oszpecić/EHIdik
otumanieć/BHIdi
parkocić/HIdikv
pikać/EHIdikv
pobiegnąć/BHIej
pochełpić/HIdik
poczerwienieć/BHIej
poddymiać/EHIdikv
podkładać/EHIdikv
podmięknąć/BFHIej
podotykać/EHIdik
podróść/BIdi
podścielić/EHIdik
podziwić/HIdik
pograbieć/BHIej
pokiełbasić/EHIdik
pokukać/HIdik
połyskać/HIdikv
pomrocznieć/BHIej
ponapinać/EHIdik
poobijać/EHIdik
poodklejać/EHIdik
pookurzać/EHIdik
popieklić/BHIdik
popołykać/EHIdik
poprzemyśliwać/BEHIdhik
poprzynosić/EHIdik
porozdrabniać/EHIdik
porozsiadać/HIdik
poschodzić/HIdik
pospijać/EHIdik
poszarpać/BEHIej
poświecić/HIdik
poturlać/EHIdik
pourzędolić/HIdik
powiadamiać/EHIdikv
powsiadać/HIdik
powyjadać/EHIdik
powypierać/EHIdik
powyściubiać/EHIdik
pozachęcać/EHIdik
pozamartwiać/HIdik
pozastawiać/EHIdik
pozesuwać/EHIdik
pozsychać/HIdik
próchnieć/BHIejv
przechytrzać/EHIdikv
przedzielić/EHIdik
przejawić/EHIdik
przekwasić/EHIdik
przemówić/HIdik
przepłaszać/EHIdikv
przesądzić/EHIdik
przeszastać/EHIdik
przetrącić/EHIdik
przezierać/HIdikv
przycienić/EHIdik
przygłaszać/EHIdikv
przykulać/EHIdikv
przynucić/EHIdik
przyprószyć/EHIdik
przysrywać/HIdikv
przytłaczać/EHIdikv
przyzwolić/EHIdi
ręczyć/EHIdikv
rozchrzanić/EHIdik
rozebrzmiewać/HIdikv
rozgrzewać/EHIdikv
rozkrochmalać/EHIdikv
rozmamłać/EHIdik
rozpalać/EHIdikv
rozpławiać/HIdikv
rozranić/EHIdik
rozsupływać/BEGHIJejkv
roztropnieć/BHIdiv
rozwydrzyć/BEHIdik
samonagrzewać/HIdikv
schadzać/HIdikv
sfajtać/EHIdik
skawalić/EHIdik
skradać/EHIdikv
skwaśnieć/BHIej
spąsowieć/BHIej
spleśnieć/BHIdi
spotwarzyć/EHIdik
spsikać/EHIdik
stłuścić/EHIdik
stwardnieć/BHIej
szkarłatnieć/BHIdiv
ślepiać/HIdikv
terlikać/HIdikv
trząchać/EHIdikv
ubezwładnić/BEHIdi
uciemiężać/EHIdikv
udręczyć/EHIdik
ugwieździć/EHIdik
ukradać/EHIdikv
ułatwić/EHIdik
umożliwić/EHIdik
unowocześniać/EHIdikv
upięknić/BEHIdi
uprosić/EHIdik
uróść/BIdi
uskutecznić/BEHIdi
usypać/BEHIej
utaczać/EHIdikv
utyrać/EHIdik
uwodniać/EHIdikv
uzwajać/EHIdikv
wcierać/EHIdikv
wgnieść/EFIdik
wkulać/EHIdikv
wpełznąć/BHIJdeij
wrzepiać/EHIdikv
współrozstrzygać/EHIdikv
wtaszczać/EHIdikv
wybierać/EHIdikv
wychrzanić/EHIdik
wyczytać/EHIdik
wydzierżawiać/EHIdikv
wygradzać/EHIdikv
wyklecić/EHIdik
wykrywać/EHIdikv
wyłączyć/EHIdik
wymłacać/EHIdikv
wyobracać/EHIdik
wypierdzielić/EHIdik
wypożyczać/EHIdikv
wyróść/BIdi
wyskamłać/EHIdik
wystrzyc/BEHIej
wyszperać/EHIdik
wytlić/BEHIdi
wywierać/EHIdikv
wyżalić/HIdik
wżerać/EHIdikv
zaburzyć/EHIdik
zacieplić/EHIdik
zadomowiać/EHIdikv
zagęścić/EHIdik
zahuśtać/EHIdik
zakłapać/BHIej
zakuwać/EHIdikv
zamarzyć/HIdik
zaniedbać/EHIdik
zaperzać/HIdikv
zapośredniczać/EHIdikv
zaropieć/BHIdi
zasklepiać/EHIdikv
zasycać/EHIdikv
zaświegotać/BHIJejk
zaturlać/EHIdik
zawracać/EHIdikv
zbiegać/EHIdikv
zdławić/EHIdik
zerżnąć/BEFIej
zeszpecić/EHIdik
zgłosić/EHIdik
zielenić/EHIdikv
zławiać/EHIdikv
zmiesić/EHIdik
zniechęcać/EHIdikv
zrazić/EHIdik
zsunąć/BEFIej
zwietrzeć/BHIej
żachnąć/BFIej
